Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 31.5
COLORADO STATE UNIVERSITY - PUEBLO

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2007 containing relocated provisions of some sections formerly located in article 55 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

23-31.5-101. University established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a university at Pueblo, to be known as Colorado state university - Pueblo, which shall be a regional, comprehensive university, with moderately selective admissions standards. The university shall offer a broad array of baccalaureate programs with a strong professional focus and a firm grounding in the liberal arts and sciences. The university shall also offer a limited number of graduate programs.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 547, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-204), ch. 308, p. 1509, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-55-101 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31.5-102. Board of governors of the Colorado state university system to supervise.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the general supervision of the Colorado state university - Pueblo and the control and direction of the funds and appropriations made thereto and has the power to receive, demand, and hold for the uses and purposes of said university all money, lands, and other property that may be donated, devised, or conveyed thereto and to apply the same in such manner as shall best serve the objects and interests of the said university.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 547, § 3, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-55-103 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31.5-103. Who shall constitute faculty.

The president and the faculty shall constitute the faculty of the Colorado state university - Pueblo.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 547, § 3, effective August 3.

23-31.5-104. Duty of the faculty.

The faculty shall have the responsibility for making academic policy and governing the academic affairs of the institution.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 547, § 3, effective August 3.

23-31.5-105. President - duties.

The president shall be chief executive officer of the Colorado state university - Pueblo, and it is his or her duty to see that the rules and regulations of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system and the faculty are observed and executed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 548, § 3, effective August 3.

23-31.5-106. President may remove officers.

The subordinate officers and employees, but not members of the faculty or those employees for which the board has reserved personnel powers, shall be under the direction of the president and shall be removable at his or her discretion. The president may fill vacancies of such subordinate officers and employees subject to his or her personnel power.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 548, § 3, effective August 3.

23-31.5-107. President may be professor.

The president may or may not perform the duties of a professor, as the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall determine.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 548, § 3, effective August 3.

23-31.5-108. Power to acquire land.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the power to take and hold, by gift, devise, or purchase or through exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to law, so much additional land as may become necessary for the location and construction of such additional buildings, structures, and other facilities as may be required for the uses and purposes of Colorado state university - Pueblo.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 548, § 3, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-55-104 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31.5-109. Effect of name change.

The legal effect of any statute heretofore designating the Colorado state university - Pueblo by any other name, or property rights heretofore acquired and obligations heretofore incurred under any other name, shall not be impaired.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 548, § 3, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-55-105 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31.5-110. Additional powers of board.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the power to lease portions of the grounds of the Colorado state university - Pueblo to private persons and corporations for the construction of dormitory, living, dining, or cottage buildings and to rent, lease, maintain, operate, and purchase those buildings at the university, all in the manner provided by and subject to the limitations contained in sections 23-56-105 to 23-56-111; except that none of the grounds or improvements shall be used in any manner that discriminates against anyone because of race, creed, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

In exercising the powers conferred by subsection (1) of this section, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system is authorized to enter into agreements which establish fixed building rental rates for the full term of any building lease, to let individual rooms and quarters within leased buildings at such rental rates as are approved by the board and prescribed in the lease, and to enter into agreements not to alter such rates during the term of any lease agreement without the prior consent of the building lessor or his or her assigns.

In addition to those powers conferred elsewhere in this article, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the power to:

Appoint a president of the Colorado state university - Pueblo who shall hold the office until removed by the board or until he or she resigns;

Appoint such other executive officers of the university as may be required;

Appoint such faculty and employees as the necessities of the university demand;

Determine the compensation to be paid to the president, executive officers, faculty, and professional staff.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 548, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1602, § 27, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 894, § 28, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-55-106 as it existed prior to 2007.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 341, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-31.5-111. Board of governors of the Colorado state university system - powers relating to real property.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall have the powers specified in section 23-30-102 regarding the sale, lease, or exchange of real property, or any interest therein, the ownership of which is vested in the board of governors of the Colorado state university system or the Colorado state university - Pueblo.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 549, § 3, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-55-107 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31.5-112. Institute of cannabis research - governing board - powers relating to the receipt and use of certain tax revenues - definitions.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Governing board" means the institute of cannabis research governing board created in subsection (3) of this section.

"Host institution" means the not-for-profit research entity or institution of higher education where the institute of cannabis research is based.

"Institute" means the institute of cannabis research created pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" has the same meaning as in section 23-3.1-102 (5).

There is created the institute of cannabis research, to be housed at Colorado state university - Pueblo, unless a relocation occurs pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

The role and mission of the institute is to conduct research related to cannabis, including clinical research, biotechnologies, clinical studies, the efficacies of medical marijuana, and economic development associated with cannabis in Colorado, and to publicly disseminate the results of the research.

There is created the institute of cannabis research governing board. The governing board consists of:

The chancellor of the Colorado state university system or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Colorado commission on higher education or his or her designee;

The president of the University of Colorado or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of public health and environment or his or her designee;

The following seven members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate:

Three scientists from relevant fields who have been employed at appropriate research-oriented institutions or entities who support the mission of the institute; and

Four members associated with cannabis-related industries within Colorado.

The governor shall name the chair of the governing board, with the consent of the senate.

The governing board shall oversee and guide the role and mission of the institute. The governing board shall direct the spending of the money received by the institute pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

The governing board shall advise any Colorado institution of higher education that seeks to develop a cannabis-specific curriculum. The Colorado commission on higher education shall seek input from the governing board before approving any cannabis-related degrees or certification.

The general assembly may allocate revenues from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 to support the institute. The institute may spend the money received from the general assembly for institute personnel, to conduct research, to produce an annual symposium, and for routine facility and administrative costs consistent with federal standards.

The institute may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. The institute may accept and expend other revenue generated by the institute, including any fees or interest earned on the money and revenue generated from the sale or license of intellectual property as approved by the governing board. The governing board may solicit, accept, expend, and disburse all money collected for the institute from the sources specified in this subsection (4)(b) for the purposes of conducting research related to cannabis and to disseminating the results of such research publicly, consistent with the role and mission of the institute. Such money may be expended for the purpose of funding activities initiated during any state fiscal year that are to be completed in subsequent state fiscal years and reported annually to the joint budget committee.

The governing board shall approve the institute's annual budget.

The governing board, in consultation with the institute's director:

Must fund research through an open, competitive process using national best practices; and

May award research funds to:

Any not-for-profit Colorado-based research entity;

Any Colorado institution of higher education and any research entity associated with such institution; or

A research entity that has a marijuana research and development license pursuant to section 44-11-408, that is operating in compliance with the requirements of section 44-11-408, and is conducting the research with a Colorado institution of higher education.

An entity or institution of higher education that receives research funding from the institute shall present its research results at the institute's annual symposium in the year after the research is concluded and shall submit any reports required by the governing board.

There is a director of the institute. The director is an employee of the institution of higher education that serves as the host institution. The governing board is the search committee to the host institution's chief executive officer, who is the hiring authority. The governing board shall provide feedback to the hiring authority for use in the annual evaluation of the director.

The director's responsibilities include management of the institute's budget and oversight of its employees, implementation of the research funding process, and delivery of the symposium.

The institute director shall annually produce a report for the joint budget committee and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, that includes the following information:

A description of the research funded through the institute in the previous year; and

An accounting of the institute's spending for the previous year.

The governing board shall submit the annual report to the joint budget committee and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, and shall comment on the annual report to advise the general assembly on the efficacy of the institute related to its role and mission.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirements pursuant to this subsection (6) continue indefinitely.

The institute's host institution may opt out of the management of the institute by:

Providing at least one fiscal year's notice to the governing board, joint budget committee, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees; and

Supporting the institute during the transition year, during which time the governing board shall conduct an open search for a Colorado not-for-profit research entity or institution of higher education wishing to host the institute.

The governing board shall notify the joint budget committee and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, if it determines that the host institution should be relocated. If the host institution is to be relocated, the governing board shall conduct a search using national best practices and complete the transition in one fiscal year. The host institution shall continue to support the institute during the transition. A new host institution must host the institute for at least five years before any subsequent relocation, unless there is good cause to change the host institution.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-191), ch. 214, p. 825, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1311), ch. 344, p. 3190, § 1, effective August 2.

23-31.5-113. Southern Colorado institute of transportation technology - governing board - powers and duties - report - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Governing board" means the southern Colorado institute of transportation technology governing board created in subsection (3) of this section.

"Host institution" means the not-for-profit research entity or institution of higher education where the southern Colorado institute of transportation technology is located, as specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section or subsequently changed in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.

"Institute" means the southern Colorado institute of transportation technology created in subsection (2) of this section.

The southern Colorado institute of transportation technology is hereby created, to be located at Colorado state university - Pueblo, the host institution, unless a relocation occurs pursuant to subsection (7) of this section. The institute shall be administered by the governing board of the institute created in subsection (3) of this section.

The role and mission of the institute is to conduct and facilitate education, training, and research on issues related to the safety, security, and innovation of railroad, ground, and intermodal transportation and general issues related to surface transportation problems in the state. The institute shall also serve as an information exchange and depository for the most current information pertaining to surface transportation education, research, and related issues, including the economic development of transportation technology in Colorado and nationwide. The institute shall publicly disseminate the results of that research.

The institute shall be a continuing resource for the general assembly, the department of transportation, local governments, the nation, and the private sector in the area of surface transportation and related research. In addition, the institute shall promote surface transportation education and research activities among Colorado and national universities to enhance the universities' ability to attract federal and private sector funding for transportation education, training, and related research.

The institute shall serve as a competitive funding resource for small Colorado businesses developing and testing surface transportation technologies. Such small businesses shall work directly with the institute, report progress in developing such technologies, and report the potential for a positive economic impact on the Colorado economy.

The southern Colorado institute of transportation technology governing board is hereby created. The governing board consists of nine members who are experts in transportation-related areas, including:

The executive director of the Colorado department of transportation, or the executive director's designee;

The director of the Colorado office of economic development, or the director's designee;

One member representing a statewide transportation industry stakeholder in the mission of the institute;

One member of a statewide labor organization representing rail workers;

The president of Colorado state university - Pueblo, or the president's designee; and

Four members appointed to the board by the president of Colorado state university - Pueblo in consultation with the director of the institute.

The members of the governing board shall select the chair of the governing board.

The governing board shall oversee and guide the role and mission of the institute. The governing board shall direct the spending of any money received by the institute.

The role and mission of the governing board is to periodically and objectively review and advise the institute concerning its education, training, and research program.

The governing board may advise any Colorado institution of higher education that seeks to develop a new transportation technology-specific curriculum. The Colorado commission on higher education may seek input from the governing board before approving any transportation technology-related degrees or certifications.

The governing board may consult with academic and industry leaders regarding the implementation of the role and mission of the institute.

The institute may spend any money received for institute personnel, conducting research and training, producing an annual symposium, and routine facility and administrative costs consistent with federal standards.

The institute may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. The institute may receive and disburse other revenue generated by the institute, including any fees or interest earned on the money and revenue generated from the sale or license of intellectual property as approved by the governing board. The governing board may solicit, accept, expend, and disburse all money collected for the institute from the sources specified in this subsection (4)(b) to conduct research and training related to transportation technology and to disseminate the results of such research publicly, consistent with the role and mission of the institute.

The governing board shall approve the institute's annual budget.

The governing board, in consultation with the director of the institute:

Must fund research, education, and training through an open, competitive process using best practices; and

May award research funds to:

Any Colorado institution of higher education and any research and testing entity associated with any such institution; or

A research and testing entity that is operating in compliance with the requirements of section 43-1-106 (8)(q) and is conducting the research with a Colorado institution of higher education; and

Any other research and testing entity in Colorado that performs similar functions to the entities described in subsections (4)(d)(II)(A) and (4)(d)(II)(B) of this section.

An entity or institution of higher education that receives research assistance and funding from the institute shall present its research results at the institute's annual symposium in the year after the research is concluded and shall submit to the governing board any reports required by the governing board.

The chief executive officer of the host institution shall select a director, who is the head of the institute. The director must be an employee of the host institution. The governing board shall serve as a search committee to advise the chief executive officer in the hiring of the director and provide feedback to the chief executive officer for use in the director's annual evaluation.

The director's responsibilities include managing the institute's budget, oversight of the institute's employees, implementing the research funding process, and delivering the annual symposium. The annual symposium shall serve as the main method of scientific dissemination of research and training projects.

The director of the institute shall annually produce a report for the joint budget committee and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, that includes the following information:

A description of the research funded through the institute in the previous year; and

An accounting of the institute's spending for the previous year.

The governing board shall produce an annual report. The governing board shall comment on the annual report to advise the general assembly on the efficacy of the institute and shall then submit the annual report to the joint technology committee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirements pursuant to this subsection (6) continue indefinitely.

The institute's host institution may opt out of the management of the institute by:

Providing at least one fiscal year's notice to the governing board, joint budget committee, and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees; and

Supporting the institute during the transition year, during which time the governing board shall conduct an open search for a Colorado not-for-profit research entity or institution of higher education wishing to host the institute.

The governing board shall notify the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, if it determines that the host institution should be changed and the institute relocated. If the host institution is to be changed and the institute relocated, the governing board shall conduct a search using national best practices and complete the transition in one fiscal year. The host institution shall continue to support the institute during the transition. A new host institution must host the institute for at least five years before any subsequent relocation unless there is reasonable cause to change the host institution before the five-year period has elapsed.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1365), ch. 259, p. 1895, § 1, effective August 10.